Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-640
Contracts; Nebraska workmen preferred.

Such contract shall provide that, wherever possible, workmen who are citizens of Nebraska shall be employed by the contractor.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 10, p. 351;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-710;

Laws 1943, c. 146, § 4, p. 524;

R.S.1943, § 70-640.